Massachusetts, session 194th, S2836.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Section 34 of Chapter 7C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
2 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting the following paragraph:-
3 (c) Prior to disposition of publicly owned real property of the commonwealth pursuant to
4 chapter 7C, the commissioner of capital asset management and maintenance in coordination with
5 the secretary of the executive office of housing and livable communities shall determine whether
6 such real property shall be made available for low or moderate income housing under this
7 chapter. In making such determination, the commissioner and the secretary shall consider the
8 following factors: (1) existing zoning that limits the siting of low or moderate income housing in
9 the municipality in which the publicly owned real property is located; (2) financial or other
10 deterrents to the production of low or moderate income housing in the municipality in which the
11 real property is located; and (3) the equitable distribution of real property for disposition under
12 this chapter to all regions of the commonwealth, including gateway municipalities as defined
13 under section 1 of chapter 40V, rural areas, seasonal communities designated pursuant to section
14 32 of chapter 23B and suburban areas.
1 of 15

15 Upon making the determination that publicly owned real property shall be made available
16 for disposition under this chapter, the commissioner and the secretary shall, notwithstanding
17 chapter 7C or any other law to the contrary, declare the property available for development of
18 low or moderate income housing in accordance with this chapter.
19 SECTION 2. Section 1A of Chapter 40A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is
20 amended by inserting the following definitions:
21 “Bus Station”, a building located at the intersection of two or more bus lines, within
22 which services are available to bus passengers; provided that a bus station does not include a
23 shelter or other structure without walls and a foundation.
24 “Duplex”, 2 dwelling units on the same parcel or lot in attached, detached, or semi-
25 detached arrangements that are designed for residential occupancy by not more than 2
26 households living independently from each other.
27 “Triplex”, 3 dwelling units on the same parcel or lot in attached, detached, or semi-
28 detached arrangements that are designed for residential occupancy by not more than 3
29 households living independently from each other.
30 “Quadplex”, 4 dwelling units on the same parcel or lot in attached, detached, or semi-
31 detached arrangements that are designed for residential occupancy by not more than 4
32 households living independently from each other.
33 “Townhome”, dwelling units that are constructed in a row of 2 or more attached units in
34 which each dwelling unit shares at least 1 common wall with an adjacent unit and that are
35 accessed by separate outdoor entrances
2 of 15

36 SECTION 3. Said section 1A of said Chapter 40A, as so appearing, is further amended
37 by striking out the definition “multi-family housing” and inserting in place thereof the following
38 definition:-
39 “Multi-family housing”, a building with 3 or more residential dwelling units or 2 or more
40 buildings on the same lot with more than 1 residential dwelling unit in each building, inclusive of
41 but not limited to triplexes, quadplexes and townhomes.
42 SECTION 4. Section 3 of said Chapter 40A, as so appearing, is amended by inserting the
43 following paragraphs:-
44 No zoning ordinance or by-law in areas or for parcels connected to a municipal or
45 centrally managed water and sewer system shall prohibit the use of duplexes or multi-family
46 housing, as those terms are defined in Section 1A, containing up to 5 dwelling units on lots
47 zoned for residential use as of right; provided, that the use of land or structures for duplexes and
48 multi-family housing containing up to 5 dwelling units may be subject to reasonable regulations,
49 including, but not limited to, 310 CMR 15.000 et seq., if applicable, site plan review and
50 regulations concerning dimensional setbacks and the bulk and height of structures; provided, that
51 regulations concerning the height of a duplex or multi-family housing does not limit height to
52 less than 3 stories; provided further, that municipalities may establish uniform design guidelines
53 for projects under this section. Said regulations either individually or cumulatively shall not
54 render the development of land for duplexes and multi-family housing infeasible and may
55 impose restrictions and prohibitions on short-term rentals, as defined in section 1 of chapter 64G.
56 No zoning ordinance or by-law in an area or for parcels not connected to a municipal or
57 centrally managed water and sewer system shall prohibit the use of duplexes or multi-family
3 of 15

58 housing, as those terms are defined in Section 1A, containing up to 3 dwelling units on lots
59 zoned for residential use as of right; provided, that the use of land or structures for duplexes and
60 multi-family housing containing up to 3 dwelling units may be subject to reasonable regulations,
61 including, but not limited to, 310 CMR 15.000 et seq., if applicable, site plan review and
62 regulations concerning dimensional setbacks and the bulk and height of structures; provided, that
63 regulations concerning the height of a duplex or multi-family housing does not limit height to
64 less than 3 stories; provided further, that municipalities may establish unform design guidelines
65 for projects built under this section. Said regulations either individually or cumulatively shall not
66 render the development of land for duplexes and multi-family housing infeasible and may
67 impose restrictions and prohibitions on short-term rentals, as defined in section 1 of chapter 64G.
68 No zoning ordinance or by-law shall impose a minimum lot size on new residential
69 developments. No zoning ordinance or by-law shall impose minimum automobile parking
70 requirements on new residential developments, including developments built under section 3C of
71 chapter 40A, that are located not more than .5 miles from a commuter rail station, ferry terminal
72 or bus station and no more than 1 parking space per unit shall be required for new residential
73 units, including but not limited to multifamily housing, developed on land that is more than .5
74 miles from a commuter rail station, ferry terminal or bus station; provided, that no minimum
75 parking requirements shall be imposed on residential facilities primarily serving seniors,
76 including assisted living communities and nursing homes.
77 SECTION 5. Section 3 of said Chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
78 adding, to the end of the first sentence, the following words:- “; provided further, that no zoning
79 ordinance or by-law may prohibit the use of accessory dwelling units as of right on lots where
80 the principal dwelling contains more than 1 dwelling unit”
4 of 15

81 SECTION 6. Said Chapter 40A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
82 section 3B the following three sections:-
83 Section 3C. Housing on land owned by a religious sect or denomination
84 (a) For the purposes of this section: (1) “religious sect or denomination” shall mean,
85 without limitation, any organization organized predominantly for religious purposes, whether
86 incorporated or unincorporated, including without limitation an organization recognized by the
87 Internal Revenue Service as exempt from taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal
88 Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, based on its status as a religious or apostolic association or
89 corporation, or an organization recognized by the department of revenue as a religious
90 organization exempt from taxation pursuant to section 5 of chapter 59, as amended, or any other
91 organization that would qualify as a religious sect or denomination for purposes of section 3 of
92 chapter 40A, or any affiliated organization; and (2) “land owned by a religious sect or
93 denomination” shall mean land, buildings or structures owned by or held in trust for the use of a
94 religious sect or denomination for at least 3 years prior to the issuance of a building permit for
95 multifamily housing allowed under this section.
96 (b) No zoning ordinance or by-law shall prohibit, unreasonably restrict or require a
97 special permit or other discretionary zoning approval for the use of land owned by a religious
98 sect or denomination for multi-family housing; provided, that 20 per cent of housing units built
99 under this section shall be used as affordable housing, as defined in section 1 of chapter 60.
100 (c) Multi-family housing shall be allowed as of right on land owned by a religious sect or
101 denomination; provided, that the density permitted shall be constrained only by section 40 of
102 chapter 131, title 5 of the state environmental code established pursuant to section 13 of chapter
5 of 15

103 21A and the state sanitary code; provided further, that the maximum setback required shall not
104 be greater than 15 feet.
105 (d) All multi-family housing developed on land owned by a religious sect or
106 denomination under this section shall comply with state water resources regulations and
107 standards established by the department of environmental protection.
108 (e) No local occupancy preference shall be permitted in excess of 20 per cent of the
109 market rate multifamily housing units developed on land owned by a religious sect or
110 denomination under this section. Any local preference shall comply with all applicable federal
111 and state fair housing laws, and shall include current residents, employees of the municipality
112 and local businesses, including persons hired to work in the municipality, and households with
113 children attending public schools in the municipality or public schools within the school district
114 in which the municipality is located.
115 (f) Up to 2 housing units or 5 per cent of the total multi-family housing units developed
116 under this section, whichever is less, may be set aside for occupancy by employees of the
117 religious sect or denomination owning the land.
118 (g) Multi-family housing constructed pursuant to this section shall not be subject to any
119 municipal ordinances, bylaws or regulations, or other municipal development standards or
120 conditions of approval, that exceed applicable requirements of state law or regulation.
121 Section 3D. Local Option Property Tax Exemption
122 A city or town that accepts this section may grant an exemption of up to the full amount
123 of the taxable valuation of multi-family housing developed on land owned by a religious sect or
6 of 15

124 denomination under Section 3C. The city or town that accepts this section shall adopt an
125 ordinance or by-law specifying the method for negotiating and approving exemptions under this
126 section. This section shall take effect in any city or town only upon its acceptance by such city
127 or town.
128 Section 3E. Housing production plans; zoning alignment
129 (a) Each municipality in the commonwealth shall, every 5 years, establish and submit to
130 the executive office of housing and livable communities a housing production plan that sets forth
131 the municipality’s strategy to meet its affordable housing needs in a manner consistent with
132 chapter 40B and related regulations. Said housing production plan shall indicate whether current
133 zoning ordinances or bylaws in the municipality permit the construction or development of
134 affordable housing to meet the municipality’s needs under such plan; provided, that if current
135 zoning ordinances or bylaws do not permit such affordable housing, the municipality’s housing
136 production plan must include proposed zoning changes that would permit such construction or
137 development.
138 (b) The executive office shall approve or deny a municipality’s housing production plan
139 submitted under this section within 120 days of submission. A municipality must resubmit an
140 amended housing production plan within the time frame provided by the executive office when
141 the executive office denies a plan under this section.
142 (b) If the municipality’s zoning ordinances or bylaws do not permit the construction or
143 development of affordable housing to meet the municipality’s needs, within 2 years of receiving
144 an approved housing production plan under this section, each municipality shall adopt or update
145 zoning ordinances and bylaws in order to comply with the approved housing production plan.
7 of 15

146 SECTION 7. Section 5 of Chapter 40A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2024
147 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in paragraph 5 the following after “in
148 accordance with section 3 of chapter 40R.”:-
149 (5) an inclusionary zoning ordinance or bylaw. As used in this paragraph the term
150 “inclusionary zoning” shall refer to zoning ordinances or by-laws enacted principally to ensure
151 some provision of affordable housing in any residential subdivision or multi-unit residential
152 project of a size to be determined by the municipality; provided, that a certain percentage of such
153 subdivision or project’s dwelling units or net floor area, as determined by the municipality, shall
154 be reserved for the construction of dwelling units permanently affordable for occupancy to
155 persons whose household income does not exceed a municipally determined per cent of such
156 municipality’s area median income as such income is determined by the United States
157 Department of Housing and Urban Development.
158 SECTION 8. Section 9 of Chapter 40A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by striking
159 subsection (c)
160 SECTION 9. Chapter 40A of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the
161 following section:
162 Section 19. Mixed-use development and multifamily housing; zoning regulations
163 (a) Any zoning regulations adopted pursuant to Chapter 40A shall allow, as of right and
164 with no minimum parking requirements for dwelling units, mixed-use development or
165 multifamily housing with a minimum gross density of 15 units per acre, subject to any further
166 limitations imposed by section 40 of chapter 131 and title 5 of the state environmental code
8 of 15

167 established pursuant to section 13 of chapter 21A, for parcels located not more than 0.5 miles
168 from a commuter rail station, subway station, ferry terminal or bus station, if applicable.
169 (b) Any zoning regulations adopted pursuant to Chapter 40A shall allow, as of right and
170 with no minimum parking requirements for dwelling units, multifamily housing with a minimum
171 gross density of 15 units per acre, subject to any further limitations imposed by section 40 of
172 chapter 131 and title 5 of the state environmental code established pursuant to section 13 of
173 chapter 21A, for parcels located not more than 0.25 miles from an eligible location.
174 (c) Any development permitted pursuant to subsections (a) or (b) that includes 10 or more
175 residential units shall set aside a minimum of 15 per cent of the residential units to households
176 earning at or below 80 per cent of the area median income or a minimum of 10 per cent of the
177 residential units to households earning at or below 50 per cent of the area median income as
178 determined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.
179 (d) If a municipality fails to adopt new ordinances or by-laws or amend existing
180 ordinances or by-laws to comply with the provisions this section by January 1, 2028, any
181 noncompliant existing regulation shall become null and void and such municipality shall approve
182 or deny applications in accordance with the requirements for regulations set forth in the
183 provisions of this section until such municipality adopts or amends a regulation in compliance
184 with this section.
185 (e) A municipality shall not use or impose standards to discourage through unreasonable
186 costs or delays the development of housing described in this section.
187 SECTION 10. Section 81L of Chapter 41, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
188 hereby amended by inserting the following definition -
9 of 15

189 “By-Right Subdivision” in accordance with section 81HH, the division of a lot, tract or
190 parcel of land into 2 or more lots, tracts or parcels where, at the time of division, every lot within
191 the divided lot, tract or parcel has frontage on: (a) a public way or a way which the clerk of the
192 city or town certifies is maintained and used as a public way; (b) a way shown on a plan
193 approved and endorsed in accordance with the subdivision control law; or (c) a way in existence
194 when the subdivision control law became effective in the city or town in which the land lies
195 having, in the opinion of the planning board, sufficient width, suitable grades and adequate
196 construction to provide for the needs of vehicular traffic in relation to the proposed use of the
197 land; provided, that any lot, tract or parcel of land shall allow for the installation of municipal
198 services to serve the land and the buildings to be erected thereon; provided further, that the
199 frontage for each created parcel shall be of at least 20 feet, but with a maximum of 50 feet;
200 provided further, that the maximum lot size for each newly created lot shall not be greater than
201 10,000 square feet; provided further, that the use of the lots shall be exclusively for residential
202 purposes.
203 SECTION 11. Section 81P of said chapter 41, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
204 inserting after the last paragraph the following paragraph:-
205 Persons wishing to convert a divisible lot into a by-right subdivision may submit their
206 plan to divide said lot to the planning board of the city of town in which the lot is located
207 pursuant to section 81T; provided, that said lot is located in a city or town in which the
208 subdivision control law is in effect pursuant to section 81N of Chapter 41. If the plan meets
209 criteria for a by-right subdivision, the board shall, without a public hearing, approve such plan. If
210 the board determines that the plan requires approval under section 81N of chapter 41, said board
211 shall, within 21 days of such submittal, give written notice of its determination to the clerk of the
10 of 15

212 city or town and the person submitting the plan, and such person may submit their plan for
213 approval.
214 If the board to which a plan to create a by-right subdivision fails to act upon such a plan
215 or fails to notify the required parties within 21 days after its submission, the plan shall be
216 approved as a by-right subdivision. A municipality shall not require additional approval from
217 boards other than the planning board in order to receive approval for a by-right housing
218 subdivision required under this section.
219 SECTION 12. Section 81T of said chapter 41, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
220 inserting, in line 2, after the words “approval is not required” the following words:- “or a by-
221 right subdivision”
222 SECTION 13. Said chapter 41 is hereby further amended by inserting after section 81GG
223 the following section:-
224 Section 81HH. By-right subdivision
225 (a) No application for a by-right subdivision shall be: (1) subject to a public hearing if
226 every tract or parcel within the lot meets the frontage, lot and access way requirements
227 established in Section81L; (2) subject to the requirements of section 81S; and (3) subject to a
228 procedural or substantive requirement more stringent than those specified in this chapter or
229 contained in a city or town’s local rules and regulations otherwise applicable to subdivisions
230 under section 81N of Chapter 41. Applications for by-right housing subdivisions under this
231 chapter shall be approved based on a determination by a simple majority of the planning board
232 that an application meets all criteria under this chapter.
11 of 15

233 (c) For a by-right subdivision on an existing way, the planning board shall take final
234 action and file with the city or town clerk a certificate of such action within 60 days. Failure to
235 take final action and file with the city or town clerk a certificate of such action within 60 days
236 shall be deemed an approval of a by-right subdivision on an existing way.
237 (d) For a by-right subdivision on a new way, the planning board shall take final action
238 and file with the city or town clerk a certificate of such final action within 90 days. Failure to
239 take final action and file such certificate within 90 days shall be deemed an approval of a minor
240 subdivision on a new way.
241 SECTION 14. Section 31 of Chapter 111, as appearing in the 2024 Official Edition, is
242 hereby amended by striking the first paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
243 paragraph:-
244 Boards of health may make reasonable health regulations; provided, that no regulation or
245 amendment thereto that relates to the minimum requirements for subsurface disposal of sanitary
246 sewage shall exceed the requirements of the state environmental code for the purposes of
247 residential housing development or construction. A summary describing any regulation made by
248 a board of health under this chapter shall be published once in a printed or on-line version of a
249 newspaper of general circulation in the city or town, and such publication shall constitute notice
250 to all persons. Whoever, themself or by their servant or agent, or as the servant or agent of any
251 other person or any firm or corporation, violates any reasonable health regulation made under
252 authority of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than 1,000 dollars.
253 SECTION 15. Section 40 of chapter 131, as so appearing, is hereby amended by adding
254 the following at the end of said section:
12 of 15

255 No city or town may enforce an ordinance or bylaw restricting the construction or
256 development of housing or other work that is primarily residential in nature that exceeds the
257 requirements of this section or of regulations promulgated by the department of environmental
258 protection pursuant to this section; provided, that the proposed work shall be considered
259 primarily residential in nature if half or more of the total project area is used to create 1 or more
260 new units of housing.
261 SECTION 16. Section 3A of chapter 185 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
262 amended by striking the fourth paragraph in its entirety and inserting in place thereof the
263 following:
264 Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, any action not
265 commenced in the permit session and not claiming a valid right to a jury trial, but within the
266 jurisdiction of the permit session as provided in this section, shall be transferred to the permit
267 session upon the filing by any party of a notice demonstrating compliance with the jurisdictional
268 requirements of this section filed with the court where the action was originally commenced with
269 a copy to the permit session, both within 30 days after the date of service of the complaint on the
270 last served defendant. Such notice of transfer shall be signed pursuant to Rule 11 of the
271 Massachusetts Rules of Civil Procedure, shall contain a short and plain statement of (a) the
272 grounds for permit session jurisdiction and (b) the absence of a valid claim for a jury trial.
273 Copies of all process, pleadings and orders appearing in the case file as of the filing of the notice
274 of transfer shall be attached to the copy of the notice given to the permit session. The party filing
275 the notice of transfer shall within 7 days send a copy of the notice by certified mail to all other
276 parties and file with both the court where the action was originally commenced and the permit
277 session an affidavit that such copy was sent to all other parties. Upon the filing of such notice of
13 of 15

278 transfer with the court where the action was originally commenced, all times for filing
279 responsive pleadings shall be automatically suspended, and the court where the action was
280 originally commenced shall proceed no further with the action unless and until the case is
281 remanded to it, and the matter shall be heard and decided in the land court permit session, subject
282 to a remand order. Within 30 days of the filing of the notice of transfer or unless the court for
283 good cause allows a longer time, a party may file a motion with the land court to remand the
284 matter back to the original court, such motion setting forth the grounds for remand with
285 particularity. Alternatively, a judge of the land court may sua sponte issue an order to show cause
286 why such matter should not be remanded back to the original court. An order of remand may be
287 issued only upon good cause and for reasons articulated in a ruling by a land court judge. If a
288 party to an action commenced in or transferred to the permit session claims a valid right to a jury
289 trial, then the action shall be transferred to the superior court for a jury trial. Nothing herein shall
290 be interpreted to abrogate any of the supervisory powers of the chief justice of the trial court
291 under section 9 of chapter 211B.
292 SECTION 17. The secretary of housing and livable communities, secretary of energy and
293 environmental affairs, the secretary of transportation, and the executive director of the
294 Massachusetts development finance agency shall jointly submit a report to the joint committee
295 on housing identifying greyfields sites across the commonwealth, options for redevelopment or
296 reuse that may include housing, public use or facilities, mixed use development, or natural
297 restoration and open space, and identify programs within the appropriate state and quasi-public
298 agencies that can be used to support communities in repurposing underutilized land.
299 For the purposes of this act, the term greyfields may include, but is not limited to, land
300 with development that is outdated, underutilized, failing, or vacant, including commercial,
14 of 15

301 residential and industrial properties. This term may also include land that is owned by the
302 commonwealth, its agencies or its political subdivisions.
303 SECTION 18. The executive office of housing and livable communities may develop a
304 model zoning code to assist municipalities and shall issue guidelines or promulgate regulations
305 pursuant to Section 3 of Chapter 40A, as inserted by sections 4 and 5.
306 SECTION 19. The executive office of housing and livable communities may promulgate
307 regulations or guidelines pursuant to sections 3C, 3D and 3E of chapter 40A, as inserted by
308 section 6.
309 SECTION 20. The executive office of housing and livable communities may issue
310 guidelines or promulgate regulations pursuant to section 5 of chapter 40A, as modified by
311 section 7, including to ensure that ordinances and by-laws shall not unduly constrain the
312 production of housing.
313 SECTION 21. The executive office of housing and livable communities shall promulgate
314 regulations or guidelines for the by-right subdivision program pursuant to sections 81L, 81P, 81T
315 and 81HH of Chapter 41, as inserted by sections 11, 12 and 13 of this act.
316 SECTION 22. Section 4 shall take effect one year after the effective date of this act
317 SECTION 23. Section 13 shall take effect one year after the effective date of this act.
15 of 15